Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0562.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 527a. (1) Subject to subsections (18) and (19), a
claimant may claim a credit for heating fuel costs for the
claimant's homestead in this state. An adult foster care home,
nursing home, home for the aged, or substance abuse center is not a
homestead for purposes of this section. The credit shall must be
determined in the following manner:
(a) Subject to subsections (18) and (19), the following table
shall must be used for the computation of a credit as computed
under subdivision (c):
KAS S03499'25 (S-2) iud2n6


Exemptions 0 or 1 2 3 4 5 6 or more
Credit $272 $326 $379 $450 $525 $601 + $76 for each
exemption over 6
(b) The amounts in the table in subdivision (a) shall must be
adjusted each year as necessary by the department so that a
claimant with total household resources of less than 110% of the
federal poverty income standards as defined and determined annually
by the United States Office of Management and Budget is not denied
a credit.
(c) A claimant shall must receive the greater of the credit
amount as determined in subparagraph (i) or (ii):
(i) Subtract 3.5% of the claimant's total household resources
from the amount specified in subdivision (a) that corresponds with
the number of exemptions claimed in the return filed under this
part, except that the number of exemptions for purposes of this
subdivision shall must not exceed the actual number of individuals
living in the household plus the additional personal exemptions
allowed under section 30, and any dependency exemptions for
individuals living in the household under a custodial arrangement,
even if the exemptions may not be claimed for other income tax
purposes. For a claimant whose heating costs are included in his or
her the claimant's rent, multiply the result of the preceding
calculation by 50%.
(ii) Subject to subsection (2), for a claimant whose total
household resources do not exceed the maximum specified in the
following table, as adjusted, that corresponds with the number of
exemptions claimed in the return filed under this part, subtract
11% of claimant's total household resources from the total cost
incurred by a claimant for heating fuel from a heating fuel
KAS S03499'25 (S-2) iud2n6


provider during the 12 consecutive monthly billing periods ending
in October of the tax year, and multiply the resulting amount by
70%:
Exemptions 0 or 1 2 3 4 5 For each
exemption
over 5,
add
$2,441.00
to the
maximum
total
household
resources
Maximum
Total
Household
Resources $7,060 $9,501 $11,943 $14,382 $16,824
(d) The maximum cost incurred by a claimant for heating fuel
during a tax year shall must be adjusted by multiplying the maximum
cost for the immediately preceding tax year by the percentage by
which the average all urban Detroit United States Consumer Price
Index for fuels and other utilities household energy for the 12
months ending August 31 of the tax year for which the credit is
claimed exceeds that index's average for the 12 months ending on
August 31 of the previous tax year, but not more than 10%. That
product shall must be added to the maximum cost of the immediately
preceding tax year and then rounded to the nearest whole dollar.
That dollar amount is the new maximum cost for the current tax
year. If the claimant received any credits to his or her the
KAS S03499'25 (S-2) iud2n6


claimant's heating bill during the tax year, as provided for in
subsection (6), the credits shall be are treated as costs incurred
by the claimant.
(e) The maximum total household resources specified in
subdivision (c)(ii) shall must be adjusted by multiplying the
respective maximum total household resources for the immediately
preceding tax year by the percentage by which the average all urban
Detroit United States Consumer Price Index for all items for the 12
months ending August 31 of the tax year for which the credit is
claimed exceeds that index's average for the 12 months ending on
August 31 of the immediately preceding tax year, but not more than
10%. That product shall must be added to the immediately preceding
tax year's respective maximum total household resources and then
rounded to the nearest whole dollar. That dollar amount is the new
maximum level for total household resources for the then current
tax year.
(2) An enrolled heating fuel provider shall notify each of its
customers, not later than December 15 of each year, of the
availability, upon request, of the information necessary for
determining the credit under this section. For a claimant for whom,
at the time of filing, the department of health and human services
is making direct vendor payments to an enrolled heating fuel
provider, the enrolled heating fuel provider that accepts the
direct payments shall provide the information necessary to
determine the credit before February 1 of each year. If an enrolled
heating fuel provider refuses or fails to provide to a customer the
information required to determine the credit, or if the claimant is
not a customer of an enrolled heating fuel provider, a claimant may
determine the credit provided in subsection (1)(c)(ii) based on his
KAS S03499'25 (S-2) iud2n6


or her the claimant's own records.
(3) A credit claimed on a return that covers a period of less
than 12 months shall must be calculated based on subsection
(1)(c)(i) and shall be reduced proportionately.
(4) The allowable amount of the credit under this section
shall must be remitted to the claimant, other than a claimant whose
heating costs are included in his or her the claimant's rent, in
the form of an energy draft that states the name of the claimant
and is issued by the department. For a claimant for whom, at the
time of filing, the department of health and human services has
identified the enrolled heating fuel provider or is making direct
vendor payments to an enrolled heating fuel provider, the
department shall send the energy draft directly to the claimant's
enrolled heating fuel provider, as identified by the claimant. If
the department establishes a program or pilot program for the
direct payment of energy drafts to enrolled heating fuel providers,
enrolled heating fuel providers may submit to the department, in a
manner prescribed by the department, the names of their customers
who are claimants. If a claimant whose name has been submitted
meets the standards established by the department, the department
shall send that claimant's energy draft directly to the claimant's
enrolled heating fuel provider. If the enrolled heating fuel
provider submits names of claimants who are not its customers and
the energy drafts of any of those claimants are sent to the
enrolled heating fuel provider, the enrolled heating fuel provider
shall return the energy drafts or pay the value of the energy
drafts to the department plus interest on the amount of the energy
drafts at the rate calculated under section 23 of 1941 PA 122, MCL
205.23, for deficiencies in tax payments. Except as provided in
KAS S03499'25 (S-2) iud2n6


subsection (5), after July 31, a refundable credit for a prior tax
year may be paid in the form of a negotiable warrant. The energy
draft shall be is negotiable only through the claimant's enrolled
heating fuel provider upon remittance by the claimant.
(5) If a claimant received home heating assistance from the
department of health and human services, a governmental agency, or
a nonprofit organization 12 months prior to remitting an energy
draft to the claimant's enrolled heating fuel provider and the
amount of the energy draft is greater than the total of outstanding
bills incurred by the claimant with the enrolled heating fuel
provider as of the date that the energy draft was remitted to the
enrolled heating fuel provider, the enrolled heating fuel provider
shall first apply the full amount of the energy draft to the
claimant's outstanding bills and then apply any remaining amount to
subsequent bills of the claimant until the full amount of the
energy draft is used up or the expiration of 9 months after the
date on which the energy draft was first applied to cover the
claimant's outstanding bills. If there is any remaining energy
draft amount at the end of the 9-month period, or if before the end
of the 9-month period the claimant is no longer a customer of the
enrolled heating fuel provider, the enrolled heating fuel provider
shall remit the remaining amount to the claimant in the form of a
fully negotiable check within 14 days after the end of the 9-month
period or 14 days after the termination of services, whichever
occurs sooner. If the claimant did not receive home heating
assistance from the department of health and human services, a
governmental agency, or a nonprofit organization 12 months prior to
remitting an energy draft, the claimant, by checking the
appropriate box to be included on the energy draft or application
KAS S03499'25 (S-2) iud2n6


for participation with an enrolled heating fuel provider, may
request from the enrolled heating fuel provider a payment equal to
the amount of the energy draft less the amount of the outstanding
bills. The enrolled heating fuel provider shall issue the payment
within 14 days after the claimant's request. For purposes of this
subsection, home heating assistance does not include the credit
allowed under this section.
(6) If a claimant whose energy draft exceeds his or her the
claimant's outstanding bills does not request a payment from an
enrolled heating fuel provider under subsection (5), an energy
draft remitted to an enrolled heating fuel provider shall must be
applied upon receipt to the claimant's designated account. The
energy draft may be used to cover outstanding bills that the
claimant has incurred with the enrolled heating fuel provider and
to cover subsequent heating costs until the full amount of the
energy draft is used or until 1 year after the date on which the
energy draft is first applied to the claimant's designated account.
If a credit amount remains from this energy draft after the 1-year
period, or if prior to the end of the 1-year period a claimant is
no longer a customer of the enrolled heating fuel provider, the
heating fuel provider shall remit the remaining unused portion to
the claimant in the form of a fully negotiable check within 14 days
after the end of the 1-year period or within 14 days after
termination of service, whichever is sooner.
(7) A claimant who is no longer a resident of this state, who
is not a customer of an enrolled heating fuel provider, or whose
heating fuel provider refuses to accept an energy draft shall
return the energy draft to the department and request the issuance
of a negotiable warrant. A claimant may return an energy draft to
KAS S03499'25 (S-2) iud2n6


the department and request issuance of a negotiable warrant if the
energy draft is impractical because the claimant has already
purchased his or her the claimant's energy supply for the year and
does not have an outstanding obligation to an enrolled heating fuel
provider. The department may honor that request if it agrees that
the use of the energy draft is impractical. The department shall
issue the warrant within 14 days after receiving the energy draft
from the claimant.
(8) The enrolled heating fuel provider shall bill the
department for credit amounts that have been applied to claimant
accounts pursuant to subsection (6), and the department shall pay
the bills within 14 days of receipt. The billing shall must be
accompanied by the energy drafts for which reimbursement is
claimed.
(9) A claimant whose heating fuel is provided by a utility
regulated by the Michigan public service commission is protected
against the discontinuance of his or her the claimant's heating
fuel service from the date of filing a claim for the credit under
this section through the date of issuance of an energy draft and
during a period beginning December 1 of the tax year for which the
credit is claimed and ending March 31 of the following year if the
claimant participates in the winter protection program set forth in
R 460.131 of the Michigan Administrative Code or if the utility
accepts the claimant's energy draft. The acceptance of an energy
draft by a utility is considered a request by the claimant for the
winter protection program. The energy draft shall must be coded by
the department to denote claimants who are 65 years of age or
older. If the claimant is a claimant whose heating cost is included
in his or her the claimant's rent payments, the amount of the claim
KAS S03499'25 (S-2) iud2n6


not used as an offset against the state income tax, after
examination and review, shall must be approved for payment, without
interest, to the claimant.
(10) If an enrolled heating fuel provider does not issue a
payment or a negotiable check within 14 days or as otherwise
provided in subsection (5) or (6), beginning on the fifteenth day
or the fifteenth day after the expiration of the 9-month period
under subsection (5), the amount due to the claimant is increased
by adding interest computed on the basis of the rate of interest
prescribed for delayed refunds of excess tax payments in section
30(3) of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.30. The enrolled heating fuel
provider shall pay the interest and shall not bill the interest to
or be reimbursed for the interest by the department.
(11) Only the renter or lessee shall claim a credit on
property that is rented or leased as a homestead. Only 1 credit may
be claimed for a household. The credit under this section is in
addition to other credits to which the claimant is entitled under
this part. An individual who is a full-time student at a school,
community college, or college or university and who is claimed as a
dependent by another individual is not eligible for the credit
provided by this section. A claimant who shares a homestead with
other eligible claimants shall prorate the credit by the number of
claimants sharing the homestead.
(12) A The department shall refer a claimant who is eligible
for the credit provided by this section shall be referred by the
department to the appropriate state agency for determination of
eligibility for home weatherization assistance and the claimant
shall accept weatherization assistance if eligible and if
assistance is available. A heating fuel provider that is required
KAS S03499'25 (S-2) iud2n6


by the Michigan public service commission to participate in the
residential conservation services home energy analysis program
shall annually contact each claimant to whom it provides heating
fuel, and whose usage exceeds 200,000 cubic feet of natural gas or
18,000 kilowatt hours of electricity annually, and shall offer to
provide a home energy analysis at no cost to the claimant. A
heating fuel provider that is not required to participate in the
residential conservation services program shall is not be required
to conduct a home energy analysis for its customers. For all rental
properties that are weatherized pursuant to this section, each
agency that determines eligibility for weatherization assistance
shall require that not less than 25% of the total cost of the
weatherization services for that property shall must be contributed
by the property owner unless the property owner is also eligible
for weatherization assistance or is a nonprofit organization,
governmental agency, or municipal corporation.
(13) If an enrolled heating fuel provider is regulated by the
Michigan public service commission, the Michigan public service
commission may use an enforcement method authorized by law or rule
to enforce the requirements prescribed by this section on the
enrolled heating fuel provider. If an enrolled heating fuel
provider is not regulated by the Michigan public service
commission, the department of health and human services may use an
enforcement method authorized by law or rule to enforce the
requirements prescribed by this section on the enrolled heating
fuel provider.
(14) The department shall mail a home heating credit return to
every individual who received assistance through the department of
health and human services pursuant to the social welfare act, 1939
KAS S03499'25 (S-2) iud2n6


PA 280, MCL 400.1 to 400.119b, during the tax year.
(15) The department shall complete a study by August 1 of each
year, of the actual heating costs of each claimant who received a
credit from the department under this section for the immediately
preceding tax year.
(16) The department may promulgate rules necessary to
administer this section pursuant to the administrative procedures
act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328.
(17) The department shall provide a simplified procedure for
claiming the credit under this section for claimants for whom, at
the time of filing, the department of health and human services is
making direct vendor payments to an enrolled heating fuel provider.
(18) The credit under this section is allowed only if there
has been a federal appropriation for the federal fiscal year
beginning in the tax year of federal low income home energy
assistance program block grant funds of any amount. If the amount
of federal low income home energy assistance program block grant
funds available for the home heating credit is less than the full
home heating credit amount, each individual credit claimed under
this section shall must be reduced by multiplying the credit amount
by a fraction, the numerator of which is the amount available for
the home heating credit and the denominator of which is the full
home heating credit amount. As used in this subsection, "amount
available for the home heating credit" means the sum of the federal
low income home energy assistance program block grant allotment for
this state for the federal fiscal year beginning in the tax year
and the amount as certified by the director of the department of
health and human services carried forward from the immediately
preceding fiscal year for the low income home energy assistance
KAS S03499'25 (S-2) iud2n6


program block grant minus the sum of the amount certified by the
director of the department of health and human services for
administration of the low income home energy assistance program
block grant, the amount certified by the director of the department
of health and human services for crisis assistance programs, and
the amount certified by the director of the department of health
and human services for weatherization. For the 2014-2015 fiscal
year and continuing through the 2026-2027 each fiscal year
thereafter, the amount used for weatherization each fiscal year
shall must be determined as provided under this subsection. If the
total federal low income home energy assistance program block grant
received for the current fiscal year is greater than or equal to
90% of the amount of block grant funds received in the immediately
preceding fiscal year, then the The amount of federal low income
home energy assistance program block grant funds used for
weatherization for that each fiscal year shall must be at least
$6,000,000.00 but not greater than 15% 12.5% of the total federal
low income home energy assistance program block grant funds
received for that fiscal year. If the total federal low income home
energy assistance block grant received for the current fiscal year
is less than 90% of the amount of block grant funds received in the
immediately preceding fiscal year, then the amount of federal low
income home energy assistance program block grant funds used for
weatherization for that fiscal year shall be at least $5,000,000.00
but not greater than 15% of the total federal low income home
energy assistance program block grant funds received for that
fiscal year. The amounts under this subsection that require
certification by the director of the department of health and human
services or by the state treasurer and the director of the
KAS S03499'25 (S-2) iud2n6


department of technology, management, and budget shall must be
certified on or before December 30 of the tax year and each tax
year thereafter. As used in this subsection, "full home heating
credit amount" means the amount certified by the state treasurer
and the director of the department of technology, management, and
budget to be the estimated amount of the credits that would have
been provided under this section for the tax year if no reduction
as provided in this subsection were made for that tax year.
(19) A claimant who claims a credit under this section shall
not report the credit amount on the claimant's income tax return
filed under this part as an offset against the tax imposed by this
part, but shall claim the credit on a separate form prescribed by
the department. A credit claimed under this section shall is not be
allowed unless the claim for the credit is filed with the
department on or before the September 30 immediately following the
tax year for which the credit is claimed. For tax years after the
2017 tax year, a A credit claimed under this section is not allowed
unless the claimant provides the department with all of the
information, as requested by the department of health and human
services, necessary to comply with the requirements of the federal
appropriation of the federal low income home energy assistance
program block grant. The department shall disclose the information
provided under this subsection to the department of health and
human services or the United States Department of Health and Human
Services or its successor. The confidentiality restrictions
provided in section 28(1)(f) of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.28, do not
apply to the disclosure required by this subsection.
(20) Notwithstanding section 30a of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.30a,
the credit allowed under this section is exempt from interception,
KAS S03499'25 (S-2) iud2n6


execution, levy, attachment, garnishment, or other legal process to
collect a debt. No The department shall not apply any portion of
the credit allowed or any rights existing under this section shall
be applied as an offset to any liability of the claimant under
section 30a of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.30a, or any arrearage or other
debt of the claimant.
(21) The department shall meet with interested parties
including enrolled heating fuel providers and advocacy groups to
identify and implement methods of improving the processing of
claims for the credit allowed under this section and payments
attributable to those credits.
(22) By July 1, 2018 and by each July 1 thereafter, the
department of health and human services shall submit a report on
the operation and effectiveness of the home heating and
weatherization assistance programs under this section and any
recommendations regarding the home heating and weatherization
assistance programs to all of the following:
(a) The chairpersons and vice-chairpersons of the senate and
house of representatives appropriations committees.
(b) The senate and house of representatives committees on
taxation and finance related issues.
(c) The senate and house of representatives committees on
energy and technology related issues.
(23) As used in this section:
(a) "Claimant whose heating costs are included in his or her
the claimant's rent" means a claimant whose rent includes the cost
of heat at the time the claim for the credit under this section is
filed.
(b) "Enrolled heating fuel provider" means a heating fuel
KAS S03499'25 (S-2) iud2n6


provider that is enrolled with the department of health and human
services as a heating fuel provider.
(c) "Heating fuel provider" means an individual or entity that
provides a claimant with heating fuel or electricity for heating
purposes.
(d) "United States Consumer Price Index" means the United
States Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers as defined and
reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor
Statistics.
Final Page
KAS S03499'25 (S-2) iud2n6